Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1207.01
Emergency medical technician practice of emergency medical care, defined.

Emergency medical technician practice of emergency medical care means care provided in accordance with the knowledge and skill acquired through successful completion of an approved program for an emergency medical technician. Such care includes, but is not limited to, (1) all of the acts that an emergency medical responder can perform, and (2) simple invasive interventions, management and transportation of individuals, and nonvisualized intubation.

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 13;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 20.